District of Columbia statutes.
5-723.05

Funds not assignable or subject to execution.

Except as provided in § 1-529.01, none of the money mentioned in this subchapter, including any assets of the District of Columbia Police Officers and Fire Fighters’ Retirement Fund, shall be assignable, either in law or equity, or be subject to execution of levy by attachment, garnishment, or other legal process except with respect to a domestic relations order that substantially meets all of the requirements of section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 , as determined solely by the District of Columbia Retirement Board.

Sept. 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 718, ch. 433, § 12(n-5)
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-314, § 2(g), 60 DCR 3466
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-314 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(g) of the Police and Firefighter’s Retirement and Disability Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-33, March 19, 2013, 60 DCR 4630, 20 DCSTAT 493).